Mississippi, session 2026, SB2249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Mobile Sports Wagering Act." SECTION 2. The following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a) "Commission" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission as defined in Section 75-76-7. (b)  "Executive director" means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Gaming Commission as defined in Section 75-76-7. (c)  "Game," "Gaming" or "Gambling game" means to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for play any game as defined in Section 75-76-5. (d)  "Gaming license" means any license issued by the state which authorizes the person named therein to engage in gaming as defined in Section 75-76-5. (e)  "Gross revenue" means the same as defined in Section 75-76-5. (f)  "Interactive gaming" means wagering on any interactive game. (g)  "Interactive game" means computerized or virtual versions of any game as defined in Section 75-76-5 or any other game of chance or digital simulation thereof, including, but not limited to, casino-themed slot machines or gaming devices, table games or other such games as approved by the commission for play in a licensed establishment. (h) "Internet" means the term as defined in Section 230 of Title II of the Communications Act of 1934, Chapter 652, 110 Stat. 137, 47 USC § 230. (i)  "Licensed gaming establishment" means any premises licensed by the commission as defined in Section 75-76-5. (j) "Manufacturer's," "seller's" or "distributor's" license means a license issued pursuant to Section 75-76-79 as defined in Section 75-76-5. (k)  "Online race book" means a race book as defined by Section 75-76-5 in which wagers are made over the internet, including on websites, personal computers, mobile phones, or other interactive devices used by an individual to place a race book wager from any location in Mississippi, and accepted by a platform on behalf of the holder of a Mississippi gaming license. (l)  "Online sports pool" means a sports pool as defined by Section 75-76-5 in which wagers are made over the internet, including on websites, personal computers, mobile phones, or other interactive devices used by an individual to place a sports pool wager from any location in Mississippi, and accepted by a platform on behalf of the holder of a Mississippi gaming license. (m) "Platform" means a person or entity that operates an online sports pool, online race book, or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming license. (n)  "Race book" means the business of accepting wagers upon the outcome of any event held at a track which uses the pari-mutuel system of wagering as defined in Section 75-76-5. (o)  "Sporting event" means any amateur sport or athletic event, professional sport or athletic event, collegiate sport or athletic event, motor race event, electronic sports event, competitive video game event, or any other event authorized by the Mississippi Gaming Control Act or the commission for wagering under this act. (p)  "Sports pool" means the same as the term is defined in Section 75-76-5 and includes the business of accepting wagers on sporting events by any system of wagering including, but not limited to, single-game bets, teaser bets, parlays, over-under, money line, pools, exchange wagering, in-game wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, and straight bets.  The term does not include fantasy contests as defined in Section 97-33-303. SECTION 3. (1)  Online sports pools and online race books shall be legal in the State of Mississippi as provided by this act.  The provisions of this act shall not be construed to authorize or legalize interactive gaming in the State of Mississippi; rather, all forms of interactive gaming are expressly prohibited and are illegal in the State of Mississippi, punishable pursuant to the provisions of Section 97-33-1 and other applicable laws.  Further, if any person or platform is found by the commission to have engaged in any form of illegal gaming, including, but not limited to, any form of interactive gaming, then such person and platform will be subject to action by the Mississippi Gaming Commission in accordance with Section 75-76-67.  These restrictions will be applied whether the platform or person is found to have engaged in such illegal activity in Mississippi or in any other jurisdiction. (2)  (a)  A platform that operates an online sports pool, online race book, or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming license in this state must obtain a manufacturer's and distributor's license from the commission in order to offer such services, and such license will be conditioned upon a platform abiding by all laws and regulations governing such activities.  A platform that already possesses a manufacturer's and distributor's license in the state shall be permitted to operate under the existing license subject to any technical approvals required by the commission to operate an online sports pool, online race book, or both. (b)  The licensed gaming establishment, including a platform that operates an online sports pool, online race book or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming license, shall report all gaming revenue and pay all taxes for such revenue as provided by state law. (3)  A platform that operates an online sports pool, online race book, or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming license in this state shall be lawfully conducting business in this state in order to comply with the provisions of this act. (4)  Application for licensure shall be made to the executive director on forms furnished by the executive director and in accordance with the commission's regulations regarding manufacturer's and distributor's licenses.  No platform will be issued a gaming license; rather, it shall be required to contract with a licensed casino operator in order to conduct online sports pool or online race book activities in Mississippi.  The commission shall only issue a gaming license to a legal gaming establishment located on a premises in a county where gaming may be conducted in accordance with Mississippi law that is operating a casino in a county that has not prohibited gaming by a referendum vote of registered voters pursuant to Section 19-3-79.  Should a gaming license expire, be revoked or be suspended, then all such online activities associated with that gaming license will cease until such time that the commission renews the license or issues an order allowing the gaming licensee to recommence its gaming operations. (5)  The contractual terms between a licensed gaming operator and the licensed platform shall be consistent with Mississippi law, including, but not limited to, the terms of this act. (6)  The commission shall, from time to time, adopt, amend or repeal such regulations, consistent with the policy, objects and purposes of this chapter, as it may deem necessary or desirable in the public interest in carrying out the policy and provisions of this chapter.  The commission shall use the Administrative Procedures Law when adopting, amending or repealing any regulations authorized under this section or under any other provision of this chapter. (7)  The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations that require a licensee to implement responsible sport betting programs.  Such rules and regulations shall require a licensee to develop a strategic implementation plan with details as to: (a)  The use of player data and technology to aid in identifying potential problem gamblers; (b)  The use of automated triggers to identify and manage accounts or potential problem gamblers; and (c)  The levels of intervention and education provided to identified at-risk players, which shall include at a minimum: (i)  A first phase involving communications with the individual in order to educate him or her on the availability of various responsible gaming features and resources offered by the licensee; (ii)  A second phase that includes a video tutorial displayed to the individual either as one (1) or multiple videos that provides education on the features and resources available; and (iii)  A third phase, when warranted, that includes access to a list of responsible gaming professionals provided by the licensee to advise the individual on possible corrective actions to address at-risk behavior. SECTION 4. (1)  Each licensed establishment may enter into contracts with (a) no more than two (2) platforms to operate an online sports pool; and (b) no more than two (2) online race book platforms to operate online race book on behalf of the holder of the gaming license for such licensed establishment.  Each platform may, but is not required to, offer both an online sports pool and an online race book.  No platform, individually or collectively with any other platform or other party, shall take any action that would restrict or limit a single casino license holder, or a group of casino license holders, from offering online sports pool or online race book services to customers.  The commission shall maintain a list of licensed platforms to be made available to licensed casino operators.  If a platform receives a request from a licensed casino operator to discuss business terms related to providing online sports pool or online race book services to its customers, then the platform will engage in good-faith discussions with the licensed casino operator.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a platform may, on behalf of its gaming license holder, determine whether to accept or reject wagers, determine the results of wagers, and payout winning wagers, but the platform will be subject to Sections 75-76-157 through 75-76-173 and subject to regulations authorized under this act, as well as the Mississippi Gaming Control Act, which may require a platform to appear before the commission or in a court proceeding to respond to any player dispute or an order to show cause issued by the commission. (2)  A platform, on behalf of the holder of a gaming license in this state, may accept online sports pool and online race book wagers placed over the internet, including on websites and the use of a personal computer, mobile phone, or other interactive device used by an individual to place a sports pool or race book wager, subject to the following: (a)  All players shall establish a wagering account and an initial identification and age verification shall be conducted before any wager by the player may be accepted by the platform.  A player may establish a wagering account with a platform in person at a licensed establishment or over the internet, including on websites and mobile or interactive devices. (b)  A platform, on behalf of the holder of a gaming license in this state, shall accept wagers only from players located in Mississippi.  A platform shall maintain geofencing or geolocating services and pay all costs and responsibilities related to such services required by the commission.  Servers, including the use of backup servers, may be located outside of this state, consistent with federal law.  To the extent required by federal law, a platform shall maintain in this state the servers it uses to accept wagers on an online sports pool or online race book placed by bettors located in this state.  A platform shall comply with all identification verification requirements and will take other commercially reasonable steps to prevent compulsive and problem gaming and to ensure that no person who is restricted or who is ineligible to participate in online gaming is able to use the platform to place bets or wagers on events. (c)  A person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall not play, be allowed to play, place wagers, or collect winnings, whether personally or through an agent, from any online sports pool or online race book authorized under this chapter. (d)  A platform will take commercially reasonable steps to prevent any person who is self-excluded from entering a gaming property in Mississippi from opening an online wagering account.  The Mississippi Gaming Commission shall maintain this list of individuals and provide it to platforms on a regular basis. (e)  Additionally, a platform will take commercially reasonable steps to ensure that any person who is a player, a coach, umpire, or referee or who is otherwise associated with a collegiate team or a professional team or an athletic event, is prohibited from wagering on sporting events for which they are affiliated.  The Mississippi Gaming Commission shall maintain this list of individuals and provide it to platforms on a regular basis.  The platform should further alert customers that violating this restriction or aiding any person who is a minor, a self-excluded person or any other person who is otherwise restricted from wagering online to circumvent such restrictions (either intentionally or in failing to use reasonable steps to properly secure a device), shall be disqualified from participating in any form of online gaming thereafter. (f)  A platform shall comply with all identification verification and compulsive and problem gambling protections set forth in law or rule. (3)  Subject to the regulations of the commission, a platform shall report to the commission: (a)  Any criminal proceeding commenced against the platform or its employees in connection with the platform's operations in Mississippi. (b)  Any abnormal betting activity or patterns that may indicate a concern about the integrity of a sporting event or athletic event. (c)  Any other conduct indicating corruption of the betting outcome of a sporting event or athletic event for financial gain, including, but not limited to, match fixing as well as any restricted person wagering on an event in which they are participating or otherwise affiliated. (d)  Suspicious or illegal wagering activities, including the use of funds derived from illegal activity, wagers to conceal or launder funds derived from illegal activity, use of agents to place wagers, or use of false identification.  In such a case where information reported from paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection, the platform shall work together with the licensed casino operator and the commission to investigate such matters and to ensure that the accounts affected by or associated with such circumstances are suspended at least until such time that the commission is able to fully investigate the matters and determine the appropriate enforcement action. (4)  A dispute over winnings with respect to an online race book or online sports pool shall be resolved under the procedures set forth in Sections 75-76-157 through 75-76-173. SECTION 5. The gross revenue of a licensed gaming establishment, including a platform that operates an online sports pool, online race book or both on behalf of the holder of a gaming license, which is derived from the activities described in Sections 1 through 5 of this act shall be subject to a fee of twelve percent (12%) of the amount of such revenue and shall not be subject to any fees imposed and/or authorized under Section 75-76-177, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 75-76-195, Mississippi Code of 1972, and/or the authority of a local and private law of the State of Mississippi.  Fees paid by a licensee under this section shall be allowed as a credit against the income tax liability of the licensee for that taxable year. On or before the last day of each month all fees collected by the Department of Revenue during that month under the provisions of this section shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the Mississippi HOPE Scholarship Program Fund created in Section 26 of this act. SECTION 6.  Section 75-76-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-67.  (1)  Any person who the commission determines is qualified to receive a license or be found suitable under the provisions of this chapter, having due consideration for the proper protection of the health, safety, morals, good order and general welfare of the inhabitants of the State of Mississippi and the declared policy of this state, may be issued a state gaming license or found suitable.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive any license or be found suitable is on the applicant. (2)  An application to receive a license or be found suitable shall not be granted unless the commission is satisfied that the applicant is: (a)  A person of good character, honesty and integrity; (b)  A person whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest of this state or to the effective regulation and control of gaming, or create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the conduct of gaming or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto; and (c)  In all other respects qualified to be licensed or found suitable consistent with the declared laws of the state. (3)  No person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a felony in any court of this state, another state, or the United States; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable hereunder who has been convicted of a crime in any court of another state or the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a felony; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a misdemeanor in any court of this state or of another state, when such conviction was for gambling, sale of alcoholic beverages to minors, prostitution, or procuring or inducing individuals to engage in prostitution. (4)  A license to operate a gaming establishment shall not be granted unless the applicant has satisfied the commission that: (a)  He has adequate business probity, competence and experience, in gaming or generally; * * * and (b)  The proposed financing of the entire operation is: (i)  Adequate for the nature of the proposed operation; and (ii)  From a suitable source.  Any lender or other source of money or credit which the commission finds does not meet the standards set forth in subsection (2) may be deemed unsuitable * * *.; (c)  All licenses issued and approved to proceed with development by the commission and operating prior to December 31, 2026, are exempt from the minimum requirements set forth in subparagraphs (i) through (vi) below.  No site approval issued by the commission prior to December 31, 2026, with an expiration date or term shall be extended beyond such term.  The proposed licensee must republish and reapply for site approval upon the expiration of any such approval.  So long as a licensee issued approval to proceed with development after December 31, 2026, is not revoked, voided, vacated, or lapsed by order or act of the commission, a proposed project shall meet, at a minimum, the following: (i)  A parking facility in close proximity to the casino complex to accommodate a minimum of five hundred (500) cars; (ii)  A hotel with a minimum of three hundred (300) rooms; (iii)  A restaurant capable of seating at least two hundred (200) people; (iv)  A fine dining establishment capable of seating at least seventy-five (75) people; (v)  A casino floor of at least forty thousand (40,000) square feet; and (vi)  An amenity unique to the licensee's market in order to encourage economic development and promote tourism; and (d)  The commission shall not adopt any rule or regulation that would reduce the requirements in paragraph (c) of this subsection; however, the commission may exercise discretion with respect to such requirements as to proposed projects if located in a gaming market along the Mississippi River; but, in all other areas where a project is proposed to be located, these shall be deemed minimum requirements. (5)  An application to receive a license or be found suitable constitutes a request for a determination of the applicant's general character, integrity and ability to participate or engage in, or be associated with gaming.  Any written or oral statement made in the course of an official proceeding of the commission or the executive director or any witness testifying under oath which is relevant to the purpose of the proceeding is absolutely privileged and does not impose liability for defamation or constitute a ground for recovery in any civil action. (6)  The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a corporation which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (7)  The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a limited partnership which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (8)  No limited partnership, except one whose sole limited partner is a publicly traded corporation which has registered with the commission, or business trust or organization or other association of a quasi-corporate character is eligible to receive or hold any license under this chapter unless all persons having any direct or indirect interest therein of any nature whatsoever, whether financial, administrative, policymaking or supervisory, are individually qualified to be licensed under the provisions of this chapter. (9)  The commission may, by regulation, limit the number of persons who may be financially interested and the nature of their interest in any corporation or other organization or association licensed under this chapter, and may establish such other qualifications of licenses as the commission, in its discretion, deems to be in the public interest and consistent with the declared policy of the state. SECTION 7.  Section 97-33-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-17.  (1)  All monies exhibited for the purpose of betting or alluring persons to bet at any game, and all monies staked or betted, shall be liable to seizure by any sheriff, constable, or police officer, together with all the appliances used or kept for use in gambling, or by any other person; and all the monies so seized shall be accounted for by the person making the seizure, and all appliances seized shall be destroyed; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering * * * on: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * * on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this subsection at a location that was legal for dockside gaming prior to August 29, 2005; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and in determining the distance to the mean high-water line, the following considerations apply: 1.  Rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of a parcel of property, nor shall the footage contained within such easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph; and 2.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and utilized pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph to any other point of reference must cross only property under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof, except for rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * * lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights‑of‑way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights‑of‑way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii). be located on: 1. Property entirely under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof that extends from the gaming floor to the mean high-water line and such land is capable of accommodating the minimum improvement requirements set forth in Section 75-76-67(4); and 2.  The entire parcel(s) of land used to establish the necessary ownership and/or lease and control of the property to the mean high-water line must be immediately adjacent to waters at a location which would have qualified as a legal gaming site for docking a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this subsection prior to August 29, 2005; (c)  A vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. (2)  Nothing in this section shall apply to any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired or transported in accordance with subsection (4) of Section 97-33-7. SECTION 8.  Section 75-76-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-5.  As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise: (a) "Applicant" means any person who has applied for or is about to apply for a state gaming license, registration or finding of suitability under the provisions of this chapter or approval of any act or transaction for which approval is required or permitted under the provisions of this chapter. (b) "Application" means a request for the issuance of a state gaming license, registration or finding of suitability under the provisions of this chapter or for approval of any act or transaction for which approval is required or permitted under the provisions of this chapter but does not include any supplemental forms or information that may be required with the application. (c)  "Associated equipment" means any equipment or mechanical, electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used remotely or directly in connection with gaming or with any game, race book or sports pool that would not otherwise be classified as a gaming device, including dice, playing cards, links which connect to progressive slot machines, equipment which affects the proper reporting of gross revenue, computerized systems of betting at a race book or sports pool, computerized systems for monitoring slot machines, and devices for weighing or counting money. (d) "Chairman" means the Chairman of the Mississippi Gaming Commission except when used in the term "Chairman of the State Tax Commission." "Chairman of the State Tax Commission" or "commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue of the Department of Revenue. (e) "Commission" or "Mississippi Gaming Commission" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (f)  "Commission member" means a member of the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (g)  "Credit instrument" means a writing which evidences a gaming debt owed to a person who holds a license at the time the debt is created, and includes any writing taken in consolidation, redemption or payment of a prior credit instrument. (h)  "Enforcement division" means a particular division supervised by the executive director that provides enforcement functions. (i) "Establishment" means any premises wherein or whereon any gaming is done. (j)  "Executive director" means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Gaming Commission. (k)  Except as otherwise provided by law, "game," or "gambling game" means any banking or percentage game played with cards, with dice or with any mechanical, electromechanical or electronic device or machine for money, property, checks, credit or any representative of value, including, without limiting, the generality of the foregoing, faro, monte, roulette, keno, fan-tan, twenty-one, blackjack, seven-and-a-half, big injun, klondike, craps, poker, chuck-a-luck (dai shu), wheel of fortune, chemin de fer, baccarat, pai gow, beat the banker, panguingui, slot machine, or any other game or device approved by the commission.  However, "game" or "gambling game" shall not include bingo games or raffles which are held pursuant to the provisions of Section 97-33-51, or the illegal gambling activities described in Section 97-33-8. The commission shall not be required to recognize any game hereunder with respect to which the commission determines it does not have sufficient experience or expertise. (l)  "Gaming" or "gambling" means to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for play any game as defined in this chapter. (m)  "Gaming device" means any mechanical, electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used in connection with gaming or any game which affects the result of a wager by determining win or loss.  The term includes a system for processing information which can alter the normal criteria of random selection, which affects the operation of any game, or which determines the outcome of a game.  The term does not include a system or device which affects a game solely by stopping its operation so that the outcome remains undetermined, and does not include any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12. (n)  "Gaming employee" means any person connected directly with the operation of a gaming establishment licensed to conduct any game, including: (i)  Boxmen; (ii)  Cashiers; (iii)  Change personnel; (iv)  Counting room personnel; (v)  Dealers; (vi)  Floormen; (vii)  Hosts or other persons empowered to extend credit or complimentary services; (viii)  Keno runners; (ix)  Keno writers; (x)  Machine mechanics; (xi)  Security personnel; (xii)  Shift or pit bosses; (xiii)  Shills; (xiv)  Supervisors or managers; and (xv)  Ticket writers. The term "gaming employee" also includes employees of manufacturers or distributors of gaming equipment within this state whose duties are directly involved with the manufacture, repair or distribution of gaming equipment. "Gaming employee" does not include bartenders, cocktail waitresses or other persons engaged in preparing or serving food or beverages unless acting in some other capacity. (o)  "Gaming license" means any license issued by the state which authorizes the person named therein to engage in gaming. (p)  "Gross revenue" means the total of all of the following, less the total of all cash paid out as losses to patrons and those amounts paid to purchase annuities to fund losses paid to patrons over several years by independent financial institutions: (i)  Cash received as winnings; (ii)  Cash received in payment for credit extended by a licensee to a patron for purposes of gaming; and (iii)  Compensation received for conducting any game in which the licensee is not party to a wager. For the purposes of this definition, cash or the value of noncash prizes awarded to patrons in a contest or tournament are not losses. The term does not include: (i)  Counterfeit money or tokens; (ii)  Coins of other countries which are received in gaming devices; (iii)  Cash taken in fraudulent acts perpetrated against a licensee for which the licensee is not reimbursed; or (iv)  Cash received as entry fees for contests or tournaments in which the patrons compete for prizes. (q)  "Hearing examiner" means a member of the Mississippi Gaming Commission or other person authorized by the commission to conduct hearings. (r) "Investigation division" means a particular division supervised by the executive director that provides investigative functions. (s) "License" means a gaming license or a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license. (t) "Licensee" means any person to whom a valid license has been issued. (u)  "License fees" means monies required by law to be paid to obtain or continue a gaming license or a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license. (v)  "Licensed gaming establishment" means any premises licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter wherein or whereon gaming is done. (w) "Manufacturer's," "seller's" or "distributor's" license means a license issued pursuant to Section 75-76-79. (x)  "Navigable waters" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under Section 27-109-1. (y) "Operation" means the conduct of gaming. (z)  "Party" means the Mississippi Gaming Commission and any licensee or other person appearing of record in any proceeding before the commission; or the Mississippi Gaming Commission and any licensee or other person appearing of record in any proceeding for judicial review of any action, decision or order of the commission. (aa) "Person" includes any association, corporation, firm, partnership, trust or other form of business association as well as a natural person. (bb) "Premises" means land, together with all buildings, improvements and personal property located thereon, and includes all parts of any vessel or cruise vessel. (cc)  "Race book" means the business of accepting wagers upon the outcome of any event held at a track which uses the pari-mutuel system of wagering and includes "online race book" as defined by this act. (dd) "Regulation" means a rule, standard, directive or statement of general applicability which effectuates law or policy or which describes the procedure or requirements for practicing before the commission.  The term includes a proposed regulation and the amendment or repeal of a prior regulation but does not include: (i)  A statement concerning only the internal management of the commission and not affecting the rights or procedures available to any licensee or other person; (ii)  A declaratory ruling; (iii)  An interagency memorandum; (iv)  The commission's decision in a contested case or relating to an application for a license; or (v)  Any notice concerning the fees to be charged which are necessary for the administration of this chapter. (ee) "Respondent" means any licensee or other person against whom a complaint has been filed with the commission. (ff)  "Slot machine" means any mechanical, electrical or other device, contrivance or machine which, upon insertion of a coin, token or similar object, or upon payment of any consideration, is available to play or operate, the play or operation of which, whether by reason of the skill of the operator or application of the element of chance, or both, may deliver or entitle the person playing or operating the machine to receive cash, premiums, merchandise, tokens or anything of value, whether the payoff is made automatically from the machine or in any other manner.  The term does not include any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12. (gg)  "Sports pool" means the business of accepting wagers on collegiate or professional sporting events or athletic events, by any system or method of wagering other than the system known as the "pari-mutuel method of wagering * * *.," and includes "online sports pool" as defined by this act. (hh)  "State Tax Commission" or "department" means the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi. (ii)  "Temporary work permit" means a work permit which is valid only for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days from its date of issue and which is not renewable. (jj) "Vessel" or "cruise vessel" shall have the meanings ascribed to such terms under Section 27-109-1. (kk)  "Work permit" means any card, certificate or permit issued by the commission, whether denominated as a work permit, registration card or otherwise, authorizing the employment of the holder as a gaming employee.  A document issued by any governmental authority for any employment other than gaming is not a valid work permit for the purposes of this chapter. (ll)  "School or training institution" means any school or training institution which is licensed by the commission to teach or train gaming employees pursuant to Section 75-76-34. (mm)  "Cheat" means to alter the selection of criteria that determine: (i)  The rules of a game; or (ii)  The amount or frequency of payment in a game. (nn)  "Promotional activity" means an activity or event conducted or held for the purpose of promoting or marketing the individual licensed gaming establishment that is engaging in the promotional activity.  The term includes, but is not limited to, a game of any kind other than as defined in paragraph (k) of this section, a tournament, a contest, a drawing, or a promotion of any kind. SECTION 9.  Section 75-76-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-89.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection ( * * *32) of this section, all licenses issued to the same person, including a wholly owned subsidiary of that person, for the operation of any game, including a sports pool or race book, which authorize gaming at the same establishment must be merged into a single gaming license. A gaming license may not be issued to any person if the issuance would result in more than one (1) licensed operation at a single establishment, whether or not the profits or revenue from gaming are shared between the licensed operations. (2)  A person who has been issued a gaming license may establish a sports pool or race book on the premises of the establishment at which he or she conducts a gaming operation only after obtaining permission from the executive director. SECTION 10.  Section 75-76-91, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-91.  (1)  All licenses issued under the provisions of this chapter must be posted by the licensee and kept posted at all times in a conspicuous place in the establishment for which issued until replaced by a succeeding license. (2) All licenses may be inspected by authorized state, county and municipal officials. SECTION 11.  Section 75-76-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-203.  In order to be eligible to receive a state gaming license, a corporation shall: (a)  Be incorporated: (i)  In the State of Mississippi, although such corporation may be a wholly or partly owned subsidiary of a corporation which is chartered in another state of the United States; or (ii)  In another state of the United States, if all persons having any direct or indirect interest of any nature in such corporation are licensed as required by this chapter and any applicable regulations of the commission; (b)  Maintain an office of the corporation on the licensed premises; (c)  Comply with all of the requirements of the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to corporations; and (d)  Maintain a ledger in the principal office of the corporation in Mississippi, which shall: (i)  At all times reflect the ownership of every class of security issued by the corporation; and (ii) Be available for inspection by the commission or the executive director or his employees at all reasonable times without notice. SECTION 12.  Section 75-76-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-33.  (1)  The commission shall, from time to time, adopt, amend or repeal such regulations, consistent with the policy, objects and purposes of this chapter, as it may deem necessary or desirable in the public interest in carrying out the policy and provisions of this chapter.  The commission shall comply with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law when adopting, amending or repealing any regulations authorized under this section or under any other provision of this chapter. (2)  These regulations shall, without limiting the general powers herein conferred, include the following: (a)  Prescribing the method and form of application which any applicant for a license or for a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license must follow and complete before consideration of his application by the executive director or the commission. (b)  Prescribing the information to be furnished by any applicant or licensee concerning his antecedents, habits, character, associates, criminal record, business activities and financial affairs, past or present. (c)  Prescribing the information to be furnished by a licensee relating to his employees. (d)  Requiring fingerprinting of an applicant or licensee, and gaming employees of a licensee, or other methods of identification and the forwarding of all fingerprints taken pursuant to regulation of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (e)  Prescribing the manner and procedure of all hearings conducted by the commission or any hearing examiner of the commission, including special rules of evidence applicable thereto and notices thereof. (f)  Requiring any applicant to pay all or any part of the fees and costs of investigation of such applicant as may be determined by the commission under paragraph (g) of this subsection (2). (g)  Prescribing the amounts of investigative fees only as authorized by regulations of the commission under paragraph (f) of this subsection, and collecting those fees. The commission shall adopt regulations setting the amounts of those fees at levels that will provide the commission with sufficient revenue, when combined with any other monies as may be deposited into the Mississippi Gaming Commission Fund created in Section 75-76-325, to carry out the provisions of this chapter without any state general funds.  In calculating the amount of such fees, the commission shall: (i)  Attempt to set the fees at levels that will create a balance in the Mississippi Gaming Commission Fund that does not exceed, at the end of any state fiscal year, two percent (2%) of the projected amount of funds that will provide the commission with such sufficient revenue; and (ii)  Demonstrate the reasonableness of the relationship between a fee and the actual costs of the investigative activity for which the fee is being prescribed. (h)  Prescribing the manner and method of collection and payment of fees and issuance of licenses. (i)  Prescribing under what conditions a licensee may be deemed subject to revocation or suspension of his license. (j)  Requiring any applicant or licensee to waive any privilege with respect to any testimony at any hearing or meeting of the commission, except any privilege afforded by the Constitution of the United States or this state. (k)  Defining and limiting the area, games and devices permitted, and the method of operation of such games and devices, for the purposes of this chapter. (l)  Prescribing under what conditions the nonpayment of a gambling debt by a licensee shall be deemed grounds for revocation or suspension of his license. (m)  Governing the use and approval of gambling devices and equipment. (n)  Prescribing the qualifications of, and the conditions under which, attorneys, accountants and others are permitted to practice before the commission. (o)  Restricting access to confidential information obtained under this chapter and ensuring that the confidentiality of such information is maintained and protected. (p)  Prescribing the manner and procedure by which the executive director on behalf of the commission shall notify a county or a municipality wherein an applicant for a license desires to locate. (q)  Prescribing the manner and procedure for an objection to be filed with the commission and the executive director by a county or municipality wherein an applicant for a license desires to locate. (3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each licensee shall be required to comply with the regulation that no wager may be placed by, or on behalf of, any individual or entity or group, not present on a licensed vessel or cruise vessel. (4)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (5)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 13.  Section 75-76-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-55.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 75-76-34, it is unlawful for any person, either as owner, lessee or employee, whether for hire or not, either solely or in conjunction with others, without having first procured and thereafter maintaining in effect a state gaming license: (a)  To deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain or expose for play in the State of Mississippi any gambling game, including, without limitation, any gaming device, slot machine, race book or sports pool; (b)  To provide or maintain any information service the primary purpose of which is to aid the placing or making of wagers on events of any kind; or (c)  To receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation or reward or any percentage or share of the money or property played, for keeping, running or carrying on any gambling game, including, without limitation, any slot machine, gaming device, race book or sports pool. (2)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 75-76-34, it is unlawful for any person knowingly to permit any gambling game, including, without limitation, any slot machine, gaming device, race book or sports pool to be conducted, operated, dealt or carried on in any house or building or other premises owned by him, in whole or in part, by a person who is not licensed pursuant to this chapter or by his employee. SECTION 14.  Section 75-76-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-101.  (1)  All gaming must be conducted with chips, tokens or other instrumentalities approved by the executive director or with the legal tender of the United States. (2)  No licensee shall permit participation by a person in a game conducted in the licensed gaming establishment if such person is not physically present in the licensed gaming establishment during the period of time when such game is being conducted, and all games and the participation of patrons therein shall be entirely located and conducted on the licensed premises. SECTION 15.  Section 75-76-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-205.  No domestic corporation is eligible to receive a gaming license unless it is in good standing in this state.  No foreign corporation is eligible to receive a gaming license unless it qualifies to do business in this state. SECTION 16.  Section 75-76-211, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-76-211.  All officers and directors of the corporation which holds or applies for a state gaming license must be licensed individually, according to the provisions of this chapter; and if, in the judgment of the commission, the public interest will be served by requiring any or all of the corporation's individual stockholders, lenders, holders of evidences of indebtedness, underwriters, key executives, agents or employees to be licensed, the corporation shall require such persons to apply for a license in accordance with the laws and requirements in effect at the time the commission requires such licensing.  A person who is required to be licensed by this section shall apply for a license within thirty (30) days after he or she becomes an officer or director.  A person who is required to be licensed pursuant to a decision of the commission shall apply for a license within thirty (30) days after the executive director requests him or her to do so. SECTION 17.  Section 75-76-175, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-175.  (1)  A credit instrument accepted on or after June 29, 1991, is valid and may be enforced by legal process. (2)  A licensee or a person acting on the licensee's behalf may accept an incomplete credit instrument which: (a)  Is signed by a patron; and (b)  States the amount of the debt in figures. * * *and Such licensee or person acting on the licensee's behalf may complete the instrument as is necessary for the instrument to be presented for payment. (3)  A licensee or person acting on behalf of a licensee: (a)  May accept a credit instrument that is dated later than the date of its execution if that later date is furnished at the time of the execution of the credit instrument by the patron. (b)  May not accept a credit instrument which is incomplete, except as authorized by subsection (2) of this section. (c)  May accept a credit instrument that is payable to an affiliated company or may complete a credit instrument in the name of an affiliated company as payee if the credit instrument otherwise complies with this subsection and the records of the affiliated company pertaining to the credit instrument are made available to the executive director upon request. (4)  This section does not prohibit the establishment of an account by a deposit of cash, recognized traveler's check, or any other instruments which is equivalent to cash. (5)  Any person who violates the provisions of this section is subject only to the penalties provided in Sections 75-76-103 through 75-76-119, inclusive. (6)  The commission may adopt regulations prescribing the conditions under which a credit instrument may be redeemed or presented to a bank for collection or payment. SECTION 18.  Section 75-76-177, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-177.  (1)  From and after August 1, 1990, there is hereby imposed and levied on each gaming licensee a license fee based upon all the gross revenue of the licensee as follows: (a)  Four percent (4%) of all the gross revenue of the licensee which does not exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per calendar month; (b)  Six percent (6%) of all the gross revenue of the licensee which exceeds Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per calendar month and does not exceed One Hundred Thirty-four Thousand Dollars ($134,000.00) per calendar month; and (c)  Eight percent (8%) of all the gross revenue of the licensee which exceeds One Hundred Thirty-four Thousand Dollars ($134,000.00) per calendar month. (2)  All revenue received from any game or gaming device which is leased for operation on the premises of the licensee-owner to a person other than the owner thereof or which is located in an area or space on such premises which is leased by the licensee-owner to any such person, must be attributed to the owner for the purposes of this section and be counted as part of the gross revenue of the owner.  The lessee is liable to the owner for his proportionate share of such license fees. (3)  If the amount of license fees required to be reported and paid pursuant to this section is later determined to be greater or less than the amount actually reported and paid by the licensee, the * * * Chairman of the State Tax Commission Commissioner of Revenue shall: (a)  Assess and collect the additional license fees determined to be due, with interest thereon until paid; or (b)  Refund any overpayment, with interest thereon, to the licensee. Interest must be computed, until paid, at the rate of one percent (1%) per month from the first day of the first month following either the due date of the additional license fees or the date of overpayment. (4)  Failure to pay the fees provided for in this section when they are due for continuation of a license shall be deemed a surrender of the license. SECTION 19.  Section 97-33-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-27.  If any person shall bet on a horse race or a yacht race or on a shooting match, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and, unless the fine and costs be immediately paid, he shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * * on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section at a location that was legal for dockside gaming prior to August 29, 2005; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and in determining the distance to the mean high-water line, the following considerations apply: 1.  Rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of a parcel of property, nor shall the footage contained within such easements and rights-of-way be considered in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph; and 2.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and utilized pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph to any other point of reference must cross only property under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof, except for rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * * lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights‑of‑way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights‑of‑way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii). be located on: 1. Property entirely under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof that extends from the gaming floor to the mean high-water line and such land is capable of accommodating the minimum improvement requirements set forth in Section 75-76-67(4); and 2.  The entire parcel(s) of land used to establish the necessary ownership and/or lease and control of the property to the mean high-water line must be immediately adjacent to waters at a location which would have qualified as a legal gaming site for docking a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section prior to August 29, 2005; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 20.  Section 97-33-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-33-8.  (1)  The provisions of this section are intended to clarify that the operation of "Internet sweepstakes cafes" is an illegal gambling activity under state law. (2)  It shall be unlawful for any person or entity to possess, own, control, display, operate or have a financial interest in an electronic video monitor that: (a)  Is offered or made available to a person to play or participate in a simulated gambling program in return for direct or indirect consideration, including consideration associated with a product, service or activity other than the simulated gambling program; and (b)  The person who plays or participates in the simulated gambling program may become eligible to win, redeem or otherwise obtain a cash or cash-equivalent prize, whether or not the eligibility for or value of the prize is determined by or has any relationship to the outcome or play of the program. (3)  As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this subsection, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Simulated gambling program" means any method intended to be used by a person playing, participating or interacting with an electronic video monitor that is offered by another person or entity; that directly or indirectly implements the predetermination of a cash or cash-equivalent prize, or otherwise connects the player with the cash or cash-equivalent prize; and that is not legal under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act. (b) "Consideration associated with a product, service or activity other than the simulated gambling program" means money or other value collected for a product, service or activity that is offered in any direct or indirect relationship to playing or participating in the simulated gambling program.  The term includes consideration paid for Internet access or computer time, or a sweepstakes entry. (c)  "Electronic video monitor" means any unit, mechanism, computer or other terminal, or device that is capable of displaying moving or still images. (4)  Any person or entity violating the provisions of this section, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not less than one (1) year, or both. (5)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (a)  Any lawful activity that is conducted for the primary purpose of entertaining children under the age of eighteen (18) years, during which money is paid for a token or chip that is used to play an electronic or other game, with the winner of the game earning tickets that can be exchanged for prizes; (b)  Any lawful marketing promotion, contest, prize or sweepstakes that is designed to attract consumer attention to a specific product or service which is offered for sale by the manufacturer, distributor, vendor or retailer of the product or service; or (c)  Any promotional activity as defined in Section 75-76-5 that is conducted by a gaming licensee. SECTION 21.  Section 97-33-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-33-305.  (1)  Fantasy contests are legal in this state.  A fantasy contest operator must comply with the provisions of this section if the operator's total player roster for all fantasy contests consists of one hundred (100) or more members of the general public. (2)  A fantasy contest operator must implement commercially reasonable procedures for fantasy contests with an entry fee to: (a)  Prevent employees of the operator, and relatives living in the same household with an employee of an operator, from competing in fantasy contests offered by an operator in which the operator offers a cash prize; (b)  Prevent sharing with third parties of confidential information that could affect fantasy contest play until the information is made publicly available; (c)  Prevent the operator from participating in a fantasy contest offered by the operator; (d)  Verify that a fantasy contest player is eighteen (18) years of age or older except as required in Section 97-33-307(5); (e)  Ensure that individuals who participate or officiate in a sporting event or who own, manage or coach a team or player who participates in a sporting event will not knowingly be allowed to enter a fantasy contest that is determined, in whole or in part, on accumulated statistical results that include a sporting event in which the individual could be involved as an athlete, official, owner, manager or coach; (f)  Allow individuals to restrict themselves from entering a fantasy contest upon request and provide reasonable steps to prevent the person from entering fantasy contests offered by the operator; (g)  Disclose the number of entries that a player may submit to each fantasy contest and provide reasonable steps to prevent players from submitting more than the allowable number; (h)  Restrict the number of entries submitted by a single player for any contest as follows: (i)  An operator shall not allow a player to submit more than one (1) entry in a contest involving twelve (12) or fewer players. (ii)  If the number of players in a contest is more than twelve (12) but fewer than thirty-seven (37), an operator shall not allow a player to submit more than two (2) entries. (iii)  If the number of players in a contest is at least thirty-seven (37) but no more than one hundred (100), an operator shall not allow a player to submit more than three (3) entries. (iv)  In any contest involving more than one hundred (100) players, an operator shall not allow a player to submit more than the lesser of: 1.  Three percent (3%) of all entries; or 2.  One hundred fifty (150) entries. (v)  For all advertised fantasy contests, the operator must prominently include information about the maximum number of entries that may be submitted for that contest. (vi)  An operator may establish fantasy contests in which there is no restriction on the number of entries, if those contests constitute less than two percent (2%) of the total number of contests it offers, and if the operator clearly discloses: 1.  That there are no limits on the number of entries by each player in the contest; and 2.  That the cost of participating in such a contest is Fifty Dollars ($50.00) or more per entry; (i)  Offer introductory procedures for players that are prominently displayed on the main page of the operator's platform to explain contest play and how to identify a highly experienced player; (j)  Identify all highly experienced players in every fantasy contest by a symbol attached to the players' usernames, or by other easily visible means, on all platforms supported by the operator; and (k)  Segregate fantasy contest player funds from operational funds or maintain a reserve in the form of cash, cash equivalents, payment processor reserves and receivables, an irrevocable letter of credit, a bond, or a combination thereof, in the amount of the total account balances of the fantasy contest players for the benefit and protection of the funds held in the accounts. (3)  An operator shall not offer contests based on the performance of participants in collegiate, high school or youth sports events. (4)  A fantasy contest operator offering fantasy contests with an entry fee in this state shall comply with audit procedures adopted by the commission to ensure compliance with this section. (5)  (a)  Advertisements for contests and prizes offered by an operator shall not target prohibited participants, minors, or self-excluded persons. (b)  Representations or implications about average winnings from contests shall not be unfair or misleading.  Such representations shall include, at a minimum: (i)  The median and mean net winnings of all players participating in contests offered by the operator; and (ii)  The percentage of winnings awarded by the operator to highly experienced players participating in contests offered by the operator within the preceding calendar year. (6)  Operators shall prohibit the use of third-party scripts or scripting programs for any contest and ensure that measures are in place to deter, detect and, to the extent reasonably possible, prevent cheating, including collusion, and the use of cheating devices, including use of software programs that submit entry fees or adjust the athletes selected by a player. (7)  The values of all prizes and awards offered to winning players must be established and made known to the players in advance of the contest. SECTION 22.  Section 75-76-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-79.  (1)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, it is unlawful for any person, either as owner, lessee or employee, whether for hire or not, to operate, carry on, conduct or maintain any form of manufacture, selling or distribution of any gaming device for use or play in Mississippi or for distribution outside of Mississippi without first procuring and maintaining all required federal and state licenses. (b)  A lessor who specifically acquires equipment for a capital lease is not required to be licensed under this section. (c)  The holder of a state gaming license or the holding company of a corporate licensee may, within two (2) years after cessation of business or upon specific approval by the executive director, dispose of by sale in a manner approved by the executive director, any or all of its gaming devices, including slot machines, without a distributor's license.  In cases of bankruptcy of a state gaming licensee or foreclosure of a lien by a bank or other person holding a security interest for which gaming devices are security, in whole or in part, for the lien, the executive director may authorize the disposition of the gaming devices without requiring a distributor's license. (d)  Any person whom the commission determines is a suitable person to receive a license under the provisions of this section may be issued a manufacturer's or distributor's license.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive or hold a license under this section is at all times on the applicant or licensee. (e)  Every person who must be licensed pursuant to this section is subject to the provisions of Sections 75-76-199 through 75-76-265, unless exempted from those provisions by the commission. (f)  The commission may exempt, for any purpose, a manufacturer, seller or distributor from the provisions of Sections 75-76-199 through 75-76-265, if the commission determines that the exemption is consistent with the purposes of this chapter. (g)  As used in this section, "holding company" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 75-76-199. (2)  If the commission determines that a manufacturer or distributor is unsuitable to receive or hold a license: (a)  No new gaming device or associated equipment manufactured by the manufacturer or distributed by the distributor may be approved; (b)  Any previously approved device or associated equipment manufactured by the manufacturer or distributed by the distributor is subject to revocation of approval if the reasons for the denial of the license also apply to that device or associated equipment; (c)  No new device or associated equipment manufactured by the manufacturer or distributed by the distributor may be sold, transferred or offered for use or play in Mississippi; and (d)  Any association or agreement between the manufacturer or distributor and a licensee must be terminated, unless otherwise provided by the commission.  An agreement between such a manufacturer or distributor of gaming devices or associated equipment and a licensee shall be deemed to include a provision for its termination without liability on the part of the licensee upon a finding by the commission that the manufacturer is unsuitable to be associated with a gaming enterprise. Failure to include that condition in the agreement is not a defense in any action brought pursuant to this section to terminate the agreement. (3)  Failure of a licensee to terminate any association or agreement with a manufacturer or distributor of gaming devices or associated equipment after receiving notice of a determination of unsuitability, the denial of a license or failure to file a timely application for a license, is an unsuitable method of operation. (4)  There is hereby imposed and levied on each applicant for a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license under this section an annual license fee in the following amount: (a)  For the issuance or continuation of a manufacturer's license, One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (b)  For the issuance or continuation of a seller's or distributor's license, Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). This fee is to be paid by the applicant to the * * * State Tax Commission Department of Revenue on or before the filing of the application for a manufacturer's, seller's or distributor's license by the applicant.  Upon such payment the * * * Chairman of the State Tax Commission Commissioner of Revenue shall certify to the executive director that such fee has been paid by the applicant. Except for those amounts that a person issued a manufacturer's license under this section may charge for goods supplied or services rendered, the person holding the manufacturer's license may not be directly reimbursed by a holder of a gaming license for the cost of any fee paid by the person for the issuance or continuation of such a license, whether imposed under this section or any other provision of this chapter. (5)  A manufacturer or distributor of associated equipment who sells, transfers or offers the associated equipment for use or play in Mississippi may be required by the executive director to file an application for a finding of suitability to be a manufacturer or distributor of associated equipment. Any person who directly or indirectly involves himself in the sale, transfer or offering for use or play in Mississippi of associated equipment who is not otherwise required to be licensed as a manufacturer or distributor may be required by the executive director to file an application for a finding of suitability to be a manufacturer or distributor of associated equipment. If an application for a finding of suitability is not submitted within thirty (30) days after demand by the executive director, he may pursue any remedy or combination of remedies provided in this chapter. (6)  The executive director and his employees may inspect every gaming device which is manufactured, sold or distributed: (a)  For use in this state, before the gaming device is put into play. (b)  In this state for use outside this state, before the gaming device is shipped out of this state. The executive director may inspect every gaming device which is offered for play within this state by a licensee. The executive director may inspect all associated equipment which is manufactured, sold or distributed for use in this state before the equipment is installed or used by a gaming licensee. In addition to all other fees and charges imposed by this chapter, the executive director may determine an inspection fee with regard to each manufacturer, seller or distributor which must not exceed the actual cost of inspection and investigation.  Upon such determination, the executive director shall certify to the * * * Chairman of the State Tax Commission Commissioner of Revenue the amount of the inspection fee and the name and address of the applicant.  Upon such certification the * * * State Tax Commission Department of Revenue shall proceed to assess and collect such inspection fee from the applicant. SECTION 23.  Section 97-33-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-25.  If any person shall sell or buy, either directly or indirectly, any chance in what is commonly called pool, upon any event whatever, or shall in any manner engage in such business or pastime, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * * on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section at a location that was legal for dockside gaming prior to August 29, 2005; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and in determining the distance to the mean high-water line, the following considerations apply: 1.  Rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of a parcel of property, nor shall the footage contained within such easements and rights-of-way be considered in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph; and 2.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and utilized pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph to any other point of reference must cross only property under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof, except for rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * * lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights‑of‑way for public streets and highways shall not b e construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights‑of‑way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii). be located on: 1. Property entirely under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof that extends from the gaming floor to the mean high-water line and such land is capable of accommodating the minimum improvement requirements set forth in Section 75-76-67(4); and 2.  The entire parcel(s) of land used to establish the necessary ownership and/or lease and control of the property to the mean high-water line must be immediately adjacent to waters at a location which would have qualified as a legal gaming site for docking a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section prior to August 29, 2005; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 24.  Section 97-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-1.  Except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-8, if any person shall encourage, promote or play at any game, play or amusement, other than a fight or fighting match between dogs, for money or other valuable thing, or shall wager or bet, promote or encourage the wagering or betting of any money or other valuable things, upon any game, play, amusement, cockfight, Indian ball play or duel, other than a fight or fighting match between dogs, or upon the result of any election, event or contingency whatever, upon conviction thereof, he shall be fined in a sum not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); and, unless such fine and costs be immediately paid, shall be imprisoned for any period not more than ninety (90) days.  However, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * * on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section at a location that was legal for dockside gaming prior to August 29, 2005; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and in determining the distance to the mean high-water line, the following considerations apply: 1.  Rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of a parcel of property, nor shall the footage contained within such easements and rights-of-way be considered in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph; and 2.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and utilized pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph to any other point of reference must cross only property under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof, except for rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * * lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights‑of‑way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights‑of‑way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii); be located on: 1. Property entirely under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof that extends from the gaming floor to the mean high-water line and such land is capable of accommodating the minimum improvement requirements set forth in Section 75-76-67(4); and 2.  The entire parcel(s) of land used to establish the necessary ownership and/or lease and control of the property to the mean high-water line must be immediately adjacent to waters at a location which would have qualified as a legal gaming site for docking a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this section prior to August 29, 2005; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 25.  Section 97-33-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-7.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-8, it shall be unlawful for any person or persons, firm, copartnership or corporation to have in possession, own, control, display, or operate any cane rack, knife rack, artful dodger, punch board, roll down, merchandise wheel, slot machine, pinball machine, or similar device or devices.  Provided, however, that this section shall not be so construed as to make unlawful the ownership, possession, control, display or operation of any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12, or any music machine or bona fide automatic vending machine where the purchaser receives exactly the same quantity of merchandise on each operation of said machine.  Any slot machine other than an antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12 which delivers, or is so constructed as that by operation thereof it will deliver to the operator thereof anything of value in varying quantities, in addition to the merchandise received, and any slot machine other than an antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12 that is constructed in such manner as that slugs, tokens, coins or similar devices are, or may be, used and delivered to the operator thereof in addition to merchandise of any sort contained in such machine, is hereby declared to be a gambling device, and shall be deemed unlawful under the provisions of this section.  Provided, however, that pinball machines which do not return to the operator or player thereof anything but free additional games or plays shall not be deemed to be gambling devices, and neither this section nor any other law shall be construed to prohibit same. (2)  No property right shall exist in any person, natural or artificial, or be vested in such person, in any or all of the devices described herein that are not exempted from the provisions of this section; and all such devices are hereby declared to be at all times subject to confiscation and destruction, and their possession shall be unlawful, except when in the possession of officers carrying out the provisions of this section.  It shall be the duty of all law enforcing officers to seize and immediately destroy all such machines and devices. (3)  A first violation of the provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor, and the party offending shall, upon conviction, be fined in any sum not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months, or both, in the discretion of the court.  In the event of a second conviction for a violation of any of the provisions of this section, the party offending shall be subject to a sentence of not less than six (6) months in the county jail, nor more than two (2) years in the State Penitentiary, in the discretion of the trial court. (4)  Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful to operate any equipment or device described in subsection (1) of this section or any gaming, gambling or similar device or devices by whatever name called while: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * * on a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this subsection at a location that was legal for dockside gaming prior to August 29, 2005; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and in determining the distance to the mean high-water line, the following considerations apply: 1.  Rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of a parcel of property, nor shall the footage contained within such easements and rights-of-way be considered in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph; and 2.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and utilized pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph to any other point of reference must cross only property under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof, except for rights-of-way and easements for public streets and highways; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * * lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, easements and rights‑of‑way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights‑of‑way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii); be located on: 1. Property entirely under the exclusive use and control of the gaming licensee or proposed licensee based on its ownership or lease thereof that extends from the gaming floor to the mean high-water line and such land is capable of accommodating the minimum improvement requirements set forth in Section 75-76-67(4); and 2.  The entire parcel(s) of land used to establish the necessary ownership and/or lease and control of the property to the mean high-water line must be immediately adjacent to waters at a location which would have qualified as a legal gaming site for docking a cruise vessel under paragraph (a) of this subsection prior to August 29, 2005; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. (5)  Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful (a) to own, possess, repair or control any gambling device, machine or equipment in a licensed gaming establishment or on the business premises appurtenant to any such licensed gaming establishment during any period of time in which such licensed gaming establishment is being constructed, repaired, maintained or operated in this state; (b) to install any gambling device, machine or equipment in any licensed gaming establishment; (c) to possess or control any gambling device, machine or equipment during the process of procuring or transporting such device, machine or equipment for installation on any such licensed gaming establishment; or (d) to store in a warehouse or other storage facility any gambling device, machine, equipment, or part thereof, regardless of whether the county or municipality in which the warehouse or storage facility is located has approved gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels, provided that such device, machine or equipment is operated only in a county or municipality that has approved gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels.  Any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired, transported or stored in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to confiscation, seizure or destruction, and any person, firm, partnership or corporation which owns, possesses, controls, installs, procures, repairs, transports or stores any gambling device, machine or equipment in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to any prosecution or penalty under this section.  Any person constructing or repairing such cruise vessels or vessels within a municipality shall comply with all municipal ordinances protecting the general health or safety of the residents of the municipality. SECTION 26. (1)  Establishment of Mississippi HOPE Scholarship Program.  The funding proceeds allocated under this act shall be dedicated to the establishment and maintenance of the Mississippi HOPE Scholarship Program.  The Office of Student Financial Aid (OSFA) of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall be responsible for the development of a new scholarship program or the enhancement of existing programs to ensure maximum college access, affordability and degree completion rates for the greatest number of Mississippians.  There is hereby created the Mississippi HOPE Scholarship Program Fund which shall be a special fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of receiving and disbursing funds under this act. (2)  (a)  Access and affordability.  The program shall prioritize financial support for students from underserved communities to remove economic barriers to higher education. (b)  Completion support.  The OSFA shall implement initiatives to improve retention and graduation rates, including academic counseling, mentorship programs and wraparound services. (c)  Alignment with workforce needs.  Priority for funding may be given to students pursuing degrees or certifications in high-demand industries as determined by Accelerate Mississippi. (3)  Coordination and reporting.  The OSFA shall collaborate with institutions of higher learning, community colleges and workforce development entities to identify eligible degree and certification programs.  The OSFA shall submit an annual report to the Legislature detailing the program's performance, including the number of scholarships awarded, student outcomes and employment rates in high-demand sectors. (4)  This section shall be implemented no later than the next fiscal year following the passage of this act. SECTION 27.  There is hereby created the "Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund," which shall consist of taxes and fees collected under this section. The Department of Revenue shall be custodian of the fund.  Any interest and monies earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.  The fund shall be a dedicated fund and shall be distributed as follows: (a) The first Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) deposited to the Mobile Sports Wagering Tax fund each year shall be transferred into the Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund, which is hereby created.  At the end of each calendar year, any casino whose total annual sports wagering revenue is below the total annual retail sports wagering revenue the same casino received in 2024 may apply for a portion of the funds in the Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund.  The Gaming Commission shall allocate funds in the Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund proportionately among eligible applicants, but in no case shall a casino receive more funds than the amount of the difference between its current year retail sports wagering revenue and its 2024 sports wagering revenue.  Any funds remaining in the Retail Sports Wagering Protection Fund after this distribution shall be returned to the Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund for distribution in compliance with paragraph (b) of this section. (b) The remainder of funds in the Mobile Sports Wagering Tax Fund shall be paid on or before the last day of each month by the Department of Revenue to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the Emergency Road and Bridge Repair Fund created in Section 65-1-179. SECTION 28.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026; however, online sports pool or online race book activities shall commence outside of a licensed gaming premises not later than January 9, 2027.